Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 2 Additional Powers and Duties

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 133, § 4(2)/HB 535, provided that this part became effective only if funds were specifically appropriated for purposes of this part in an Appropriations Act making specific reference to this part and became effective when funds so appropriated
became available for expenditure. Funds were not appropriated at the 2008 or 2009 sessions of the General Assembly. However, Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 24/SB 244, effective July 1, 2010, repealed Ga. L. 2008, p. 133, § 4/HB 535.

37-2-50.
Additional powers and duties.

Commencing with the calendar month immediately following the month in which this part becomes effective, for the purposes of this article, the office and ombudsman shall, in addition to those powers and duties provided by Code Section 37-2-47, receive,
investigate, refer, and attempt to resolve complaints made by or on behalf of all consumers with developmental disability or addictive disease.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 133, § 3/HB 535.